District of Columbia statutes.
47-317.04a

Chief Financial Officer — Authorization to privatize tax administration and collection.

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia may enter into contracts with a private entity for the administration and collection of taxes of the District of Columbia.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 764, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11302

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-317.4a.

Effective Dates

Section 11721 of Title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 786, the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, provided that except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.
[Reserved].